Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Chapter 5 Loan, Real Estate and Abstract Companies [Repealed]

§§ 17-5-101 through 17-5-105.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1988, ch. 59, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to banks, banking and finance, see title 13.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1905, ch. 60, §§ 1 through 5, and Laws 1919, ch. 63, §§ 1 and 2, related to loan, real estate and abstract companies.